Illinois, session 104th, HB4129.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois TRUST Act is amended by adding 5Section 35 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 805/35 new)7    Sec. 35. Department of Corrections; county sheriffs. The 8provisions of this Act do not apply to the Department of 9Corrections and the Department shall comply with the 10provisions of subsection (7) of Section 3-2-2 of the Unified 11Code of Corrections. The provisions of this Act do not apply to 12county sheriffs and the county sheriffs shall comply with the 13provisions of Section 3-6019.1 of the Counties Code. 14    Section 10. The Counties Code is amended by adding Section 153-6019.1 as follows: 16    (55 ILCS 5/3-6019.1 new)17    Sec. 3-6019.1. Immigration enforcement. The county sheriff 18shall, at the request of the Department of Homeland Security, 19including, but not limited to, Immigration and Customs 20Enforcement or a federal immigrant agent:21        (1) participate, support, or assist in any capacity   HB4129- 2 -LRB104 14616 RLC 27758 b1    with an immigration agent's enforcement operations;2        (2) provide the immigration agent access to an 3    individual in the sheriff's custody, either in person or 4    by telephone;5        (3) transfer any individual in the sheriff's custody 6    into an immigration agent's custody; 7        (4) allow the use of county jail facilities or 8    equipment, including any electronic databases, for 9    investigative interviews or other investigative or 10    immigration enforcement purpose;11        (5) enter into or maintain any agreement regarding 12    direct access to any electronic database or other 13    data-sharing platform maintained by the county sheriff and 14    provide such direct access to the U.S. Immigration and 15    Customs Enforcement Agency; and 16        (6) provide information in response to any immigration 17    agent's inquiry or request for information regarding any 18    individual in the sheriff's custody, including information 19    regarding the individual's release.  20    Section 15. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 21changing Section 3-2-2 as follows: 22    (730 ILCS 5/3-2-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-2-2)23    Sec. 3-2-2. Powers and duties of the Department. 24    (1) In addition to the powers, duties, and   HB4129- 3 -LRB104 14616 RLC 27758 b1responsibilities which are otherwise provided by law, the 2Department shall have the following powers:3        (a) To accept persons committed to it by the courts of 4    this State for care, custody, treatment, and 5    rehabilitation, and to accept federal prisoners and 6    noncitizens over whom the Office of the Federal Detention 7    Trustee is authorized to exercise the federal detention 8    function for limited purposes and periods of time.9        (b) To develop and maintain reception and evaluation 10    units for purposes of analyzing the custody and 11    rehabilitation needs of persons committed to it and to 12    assign such persons to institutions and programs under its 13    control or transfer them to other appropriate agencies. In 14    consultation with the Department of Alcoholism and 15    Substance Abuse (now the Department of Human Services), 16    the Department of Corrections shall develop a master plan 17    for the screening and evaluation of persons committed to 18    its custody who have alcohol or drug abuse problems, and 19    for making appropriate treatment available to such 20    persons; the Department shall report to the General 21    Assembly on such plan not later than April 1, 1987. The 22    maintenance and implementation of such plan shall be 23    contingent upon the availability of funds.24        (b-1) To create and implement, on January 1, 2002, a 25    pilot program to establish the effectiveness of 26    pupillometer technology (the measurement of the pupil's   HB4129- 4 -LRB104 14616 RLC 27758 b1    reaction to light) as an alternative to a urine test for 2    purposes of screening and evaluating persons committed to 3    its custody who have alcohol or drug problems. The pilot 4    program shall require the pupillometer technology to be 5    used in at least one Department of Corrections facility. 6    The Director may expand the pilot program to include an 7    additional facility or facilities as he or she deems 8    appropriate. A minimum of 4,000 tests shall be included in 9    the pilot program. The Department must report to the 10    General Assembly on the effectiveness of the program by 11    January 1, 2003.12        (b-5) To develop, in consultation with the Illinois 13    State Police, a program for tracking and evaluating each 14    inmate from commitment through release for recording his 15    or her gang affiliations, activities, or ranks.16        (c) To maintain and administer all State correctional 17    institutions and facilities under its control and to 18    establish new ones as needed. Pursuant to its power to 19    establish new institutions and facilities, the Department 20    may, with the written approval of the Governor, authorize 21    the Department of Central Management Services to enter 22    into an agreement of the type described in subsection (d) 23    of Section 405-300 of the Department of Central Management 24    Services Law. The Department shall designate those 25    institutions which shall constitute the State Penitentiary 26    System. The Department of Juvenile Justice shall maintain   HB4129- 5 -LRB104 14616 RLC 27758 b1    and administer all State youth centers pursuant to 2    subsection (d) of Section 3-2.5-20. 3        Pursuant to its power to establish new institutions 4    and facilities, the Department may authorize the 5    Department of Central Management Services to accept bids 6    from counties and municipalities for the construction, 7    remodeling, or conversion of a structure to be leased to 8    the Department of Corrections for the purposes of its 9    serving as a correctional institution or facility. Such 10    construction, remodeling, or conversion may be financed 11    with revenue bonds issued pursuant to the Industrial 12    Building Revenue Bond Act by the municipality or county. 13    The lease specified in a bid shall be for a term of not 14    less than the time needed to retire any revenue bonds used 15    to finance the project, but not to exceed 40 years. The 16    lease may grant to the State the option to purchase the 17    structure outright.18        Upon receipt of the bids, the Department may certify 19    one or more of the bids and shall submit any such bids to 20    the General Assembly for approval. Upon approval of a bid 21    by a constitutional majority of both houses of the General 22    Assembly, pursuant to joint resolution, the Department of 23    Central Management Services may enter into an agreement 24    with the county or municipality pursuant to such bid.25        (c-5) To build and maintain regional juvenile 26    detention centers and to charge a per diem to the counties   HB4129- 6 -LRB104 14616 RLC 27758 b1    as established by the Department to defray the costs of 2    housing each minor in a center. In this subsection (c-5), 3    "juvenile detention center" means a facility to house 4    minors during pendency of trial who have been transferred 5    from proceedings under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 to 6    prosecutions under the criminal laws of this State in 7    accordance with Section 5-805 of the Juvenile Court Act of 8    1987, whether the transfer was by operation of law or 9    permissive under that Section. The Department shall 10    designate the counties to be served by each regional 11    juvenile detention center.12        (d) To develop and maintain programs of control, 13    rehabilitation, and employment of committed persons within 14    its institutions.15        (d-5) To provide a pre-release job preparation program 16    for inmates at Illinois adult correctional centers. 17        (d-10) To provide educational and visitation 18    opportunities to committed persons within its institutions 19    through temporary access to content-controlled tablets 20    that may be provided as a privilege to committed persons 21    to induce or reward compliance. 22        (e) To establish a system of supervision and guidance 23    of committed persons in the community.24        (f) To establish in cooperation with the Department of 25    Transportation to supply a sufficient number of prisoners 26    for use by the Department of Transportation to clean up   HB4129- 7 -LRB104 14616 RLC 27758 b1    the trash and garbage along State, county, township, or 2    municipal highways as designated by the Department of 3    Transportation. The Department of Corrections, at the 4    request of the Department of Transportation, shall furnish 5    such prisoners at least annually for a period to be agreed 6    upon between the Director of Corrections and the Secretary 7    of Transportation. The prisoners used on this program 8    shall be selected by the Director of Corrections on 9    whatever basis he deems proper in consideration of their 10    term, behavior and earned eligibility to participate in 11    such program - where they will be outside of the prison 12    facility but still in the custody of the Department of 13    Corrections. Prisoners convicted of first degree murder, 14    or a Class X felony, or armed violence, or aggravated 15    kidnapping, or criminal sexual assault, aggravated 16    criminal sexual abuse or a subsequent conviction for 17    criminal sexual abuse, or forcible detention, or arson, or 18    a prisoner adjudged a Habitual Criminal shall not be 19    eligible for selection to participate in such program. The 20    prisoners shall remain as prisoners in the custody of the 21    Department of Corrections and such Department shall 22    furnish whatever security is necessary. The Department of 23    Transportation shall furnish trucks and equipment for the 24    highway cleanup program and personnel to supervise and 25    direct the program. Neither the Department of Corrections 26    nor the Department of Transportation shall replace any   HB4129- 8 -LRB104 14616 RLC 27758 b1    regular employee with a prisoner.2        (g) To maintain records of persons committed to it and 3    to establish programs of research, statistics, and 4    planning.5        (h) To investigate the grievances of any person 6    committed to the Department and to inquire into any 7    alleged misconduct by employees or committed persons; and 8    for these purposes it may issue subpoenas and compel the 9    attendance of witnesses and the production of writings and 10    papers, and may examine under oath any witnesses who may 11    appear before it; to also investigate alleged violations 12    of a parolee's or releasee's conditions of parole or 13    release; and for this purpose it may issue subpoenas and 14    compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of 15    documents only if there is reason to believe that such 16    procedures would provide evidence that such violations 17    have occurred.18        If any person fails to obey a subpoena issued under 19    this subsection, the Director may apply to any circuit 20    court to secure compliance with the subpoena. The failure 21    to comply with the order of the court issued in response 22    thereto shall be punishable as contempt of court.23        (i) To appoint and remove the chief administrative 24    officers, and administer programs of training and 25    development of personnel of the Department. Personnel 26    assigned by the Department to be responsible for the   HB4129- 9 -LRB104 14616 RLC 27758 b1    custody and control of committed persons or to investigate 2    the alleged misconduct of committed persons or employees 3    or alleged violations of a parolee's or releasee's 4    conditions of parole shall be conservators of the peace 5    for those purposes, and shall have the full power of peace 6    officers outside of the facilities of the Department in 7    the protection, arrest, retaking, and reconfining of 8    committed persons or where the exercise of such power is 9    necessary to the investigation of such misconduct or 10    violations. This subsection shall not apply to persons 11    committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice under the 12    Juvenile Court Act of 1987 on aftercare release.13        (j) To cooperate with other departments and agencies 14    and with local communities for the development of 15    standards and programs for better correctional services in 16    this State.17        (k) To administer all moneys and properties of the 18    Department.19        (l) To report annually to the Governor on the 20    committed persons, institutions, and programs of the 21    Department.22        (l-5) (Blank).23        (m) To make all rules and regulations and exercise all 24    powers and duties vested by law in the Department.25        (n) To establish rules and regulations for 26    administering a system of sentence credits, established in   HB4129- 10 -LRB104 14616 RLC 27758 b1    accordance with Section 3-6-3, subject to review by the 2    Prisoner Review Board.3        (o) To administer the distribution of funds from the 4    State Treasury to reimburse counties where State penal 5    institutions are located for the payment of assistant 6    state's attorneys' salaries under Section 4-2001 of the 7    Counties Code.8        (p) To exchange information with the Department of 9    Human Services and the Department of Healthcare and Family 10    Services for the purpose of verifying living arrangements 11    and for other purposes directly connected with the 12    administration of this Code and the Illinois Public Aid 13    Code.14        (q) To establish a diversion program.15        The program shall provide a structured environment for 16    selected technical parole or mandatory supervised release 17    violators and committed persons who have violated the 18    rules governing their conduct while in work release. This 19    program shall not apply to those persons who have 20    committed a new offense while serving on parole or 21    mandatory supervised release or while committed to work 22    release.23        Elements of the program shall include, but shall not 24    be limited to, the following:25            (1) The staff of a diversion facility shall 26        provide supervision in accordance with required   HB4129- 11 -LRB104 14616 RLC 27758 b1        objectives set by the facility.2            (2) Participants shall be required to maintain 3        employment.4            (3) Each participant shall pay for room and board 5        at the facility on a sliding-scale basis according to 6        the participant's income.7            (4) Each participant shall:8                (A) provide restitution to victims in 9            accordance with any court order;10                (B) provide financial support to his 11            dependents; and12                (C) make appropriate payments toward any other 13            court-ordered obligations.14            (5) Each participant shall complete community 15        service in addition to employment.16            (6) Participants shall take part in such 17        counseling, educational, and other programs as the 18        Department may deem appropriate.19            (7) Participants shall submit to drug and alcohol 20        screening.21            (8) The Department shall promulgate rules 22        governing the administration of the program.23        (r) To enter into intergovernmental cooperation 24    agreements under which persons in the custody of the 25    Department may participate in a county impact 26    incarceration program established under Section 3-6038 or   HB4129- 12 -LRB104 14616 RLC 27758 b1    3-15003.5 of the Counties Code.2        (r-5) (Blank).3        (r-10) To systematically and routinely identify with 4    respect to each streetgang active within the correctional 5    system: (1) each active gang; (2) every existing 6    inter-gang affiliation or alliance; and (3) the current 7    leaders in each gang. The Department shall promptly 8    segregate leaders from inmates who belong to their gangs 9    and allied gangs. "Segregate" means no physical contact 10    and, to the extent possible under the conditions and space 11    available at the correctional facility, prohibition of 12    visual and sound communication. For the purposes of this 13    paragraph (r-10), "leaders" means persons who:14            (i) are members of a criminal streetgang;15            (ii) with respect to other individuals within the 16        streetgang, occupy a position of organizer, 17        supervisor, or other position of management or 18        leadership; and19            (iii) are actively and personally engaged in 20        directing, ordering, authorizing, or requesting 21        commission of criminal acts by others, which are 22        punishable as a felony, in furtherance of streetgang 23        related activity both within and outside of the 24        Department of Corrections.25    "Streetgang", "gang", and "streetgang related" have the 26    meanings ascribed to them in Section 10 of the Illinois   HB4129- 13 -LRB104 14616 RLC 27758 b1    Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus Prevention Act.2        (s) To operate a super-maximum security institution, 3    in order to manage and supervise inmates who are 4    disruptive or dangerous and provide for the safety and 5    security of the staff and the other inmates.6        (t) To monitor any unprivileged conversation or any 7    unprivileged communication, whether in person or by mail, 8    telephone, or other means, between an inmate who, before 9    commitment to the Department, was a member of an organized 10    gang and any other person without the need to show cause or 11    satisfy any other requirement of law before beginning the 12    monitoring, except as constitutionally required. The 13    monitoring may be by video, voice, or other method of 14    recording or by any other means. As used in this 15    subdivision (1)(t), "organized gang" has the meaning 16    ascribed to it in Section 10 of the Illinois Streetgang 17    Terrorism Omnibus Prevention Act.18        As used in this subdivision (1)(t), "unprivileged 19    conversation" or "unprivileged communication" means a 20    conversation or communication that is not protected by any 21    privilege recognized by law or by decision, rule, or order 22    of the Illinois Supreme Court.23        (u) To establish a Women's and Children's Pre-release 24    Community Supervision Program for the purpose of providing 25    housing and services to eligible female inmates, as 26    determined by the Department, and their newborn and young   HB4129- 14 -LRB104 14616 RLC 27758 b1    children.2        (u-5) To issue an order, whenever a person committed 3    to the Department absconds or absents himself or herself, 4    without authority to do so, from any facility or program 5    to which he or she is assigned. The order shall be 6    certified by the Director, the Supervisor of the 7    Apprehension Unit, or any person duly designated by the 8    Director, with the seal of the Department affixed. The 9    order shall be directed to all sheriffs, coroners, and 10    police officers, or to any particular person named in the 11    order. Any order issued pursuant to this subdivision 12    (1)(u-5) shall be sufficient warrant for the officer or 13    person named in the order to arrest and deliver the 14    committed person to the proper correctional officials and 15    shall be executed the same as criminal process. 16        (u-6) To appoint a point of contact person who shall 17    receive suggestions, complaints, or other requests to the 18    Department from visitors to Department institutions or 19    facilities and from other members of the public.20        (v) To do all other acts necessary to carry out the 21    provisions of this Chapter.22    (2) The Department of Corrections shall by January 1, 231998, consider building and operating a correctional facility 24within 100 miles of a county of over 2,000,000 inhabitants, 25especially a facility designed to house juvenile participants 26in the impact incarceration program.  HB4129- 15 -LRB104 14616 RLC 27758 b1    (3) When the Department lets bids for contracts for 2medical services to be provided to persons committed to 3Department facilities by a health maintenance organization, 4medical service corporation, or other health care provider, 5the bid may only be let to a health care provider that has 6obtained an irrevocable letter of credit or performance bond 7issued by a company whose bonds have an investment grade or 8higher rating by a bond rating organization.9    (4) When the Department lets bids for contracts for food 10or commissary services to be provided to Department 11facilities, the bid may only be let to a food or commissary 12services provider that has obtained an irrevocable letter of 13credit or performance bond issued by a company whose bonds 14have an investment grade or higher rating by a bond rating 15organization.16    (5) On and after the date 6 months after August 16, 2013 17(the effective date of Public Act 98-488), as provided in the 18Executive Order 1 (2012) Implementation Act, all of the 19powers, duties, rights, and responsibilities related to State 20healthcare purchasing under this Code that were transferred 21from the Department of Corrections to the Department of 22Healthcare and Family Services by Executive Order 3 (2005) are 23transferred back to the Department of Corrections; however, 24powers, duties, rights, and responsibilities related to State 25healthcare purchasing under this Code that were exercised by 26the Department of Corrections before the effective date of   HB4129- 16 -LRB104 14616 RLC 27758 b1Executive Order 3 (2005) but that pertain to individuals 2resident in facilities operated by the Department of Juvenile 3Justice are transferred to the Department of Juvenile Justice. 4    (6) The Department of Corrections shall provide lactation 5or nursing mothers rooms for personnel of the Department. The 6rooms shall be provided in each facility of the Department 7that employs nursing mothers. Each individual lactation room 8must: 9        (i) contain doors that lock; 10        (ii) have an "Occupied" sign for each door; 11        (iii) contain electrical outlets for plugging in 12    breast pumps; 13        (iv) have sufficient lighting and ventilation; 14        (v) contain comfortable chairs; 15        (vi) contain a countertop or table for all necessary 16    supplies for lactation; 17        (vii) contain a wastebasket and chemical cleaners to 18    wash one's hands and to clean the surfaces of the 19    countertop or table; 20        (viii) have a functional sink; 21        (ix) have a minimum of one refrigerator for storage of 22    the breast milk; and 23        (x) receive routine daily maintenance. 24    (7) The Department of Corrections shall, at the request of 25the Department of Homeland Security, including, but not 26limited to, Immigration and Customs Enforcement or a federal   HB4129- 17 -LRB104 14616 RLC 27758 b1immigrant agent:2        (i) participate, support, or assist in any capacity 3    with an immigration agent's enforcement operations;4        (ii) provide the immigration agent access to an 5    individual in the Department's custody, either in person 6    or by telephone;7        (iii) transfer any individual in the Department's 8    custody into an immigration agent's custody;9        (iv) allow the use of Department facilities or 10    equipment, including any electronic databases, for 11    investigative interviews or other investigative or 12    immigration enforcement purpose;13        (v) enter into or maintain any agreement regarding 14    direct access to any electronic database or other 15    data-sharing platform maintained by the Department and 16    provide such direct access to the U.S. Immigration and 17    Customs Enforcement Agency; and18        (vi) provide information in response to any 19    immigration agent's inquiry or request for information 20    regarding any individual in the Department's custody, 21    including information regarding the individual's release. 22(Source: P.A. 102-350, eff. 8-13-21; 102-535, eff. 1-1-22; 23102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1030, eff. 245-27-22; 103-834, eff. 1-1-25.)